District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-1804

Removal of 911 system costs from base rates.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 605, 47 DCR 6308
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 502(d), 50 DCR 5668

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 605 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90-day) authorization of applicability of section, see § 609 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 502(d) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 502(d) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).